Hawaii statutes.
[§472-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Intubate" means to pass a tube into
the trachea for purposes of anesthesia and airway maintenance.

"Monitor" means to evaluate patient
health by tracking vital signs via physical examination and multi-parameter
monitors in order to recognize abnormalities while an animal is under
anesthesia.

"Practice of veterinary technology"
includes but is not limited to the following procedures only under the direct
supervision of a licensed veterinarian:

(1) Monitoring anesthesia;

(2) Intubating;

(3) Performing dental cleaning;

(4) Creating a relief hole in the skin to facilitate
placement of an intravenous catheter; and

(5) Participating in laboratory management
activities. [L 2016, c 147, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next